Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-218
Public library; property; exemption from execution and taxation; when.

The property of any public library shall be exempt from execution and shall be exempt from taxation to the extent it is used for a public purpose.

Laws 1911, c. 73, § 12, p. 317;

R.S.1913, § 3803;

C.S.1922, § 3196;

C.S.1929, § 51-212;

R.S.1943, § 51-218;

Laws 2001, LB 173, § 16.